Alaska, session 34, SB146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.11.025(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) In addition to other appropriations and funding sources, the department 06 may make disbursements [PROVIDE GRANT FUNDING] from the fund 07 established under AS 14.11.030 to 08 (1) provide grant funding to a school district that is a regional 09 educational attendance area or a small municipal school district; 10 (2) fund construction and major maintenance projects at Mt. 11 Edgecumbe High School; and 12 (3) fund major maintenance projects for housing that is 13 (A) owned by the state, a regional educational attendance 14 area, or a small municipal school district; 01 (B) located in a regional educational attendance area or a 02 small municipal school district; and 03 (C) provided to teachers working in the regional 04 educational attendance area or the small municipal school district. 05 * Sec. 2. AS 14.11.030(a) is amended to read: 06 (a) The regional educational attendance area and small municipal school 07 district school fund is created as an account in the general fund to be used, in addition 08 to other funding sources, to fund projects approved under AS 14.11.025 for the costs 09 of school construction and major maintenance in regional educational attendance 10 areas, in [AND] small municipal school districts, and at Mt. Edgecumbe High 11 School and for major maintenance projects for teacher housing described in 12 AS 14.11.025(a)(3). The primary function of the fund is to fund school construction 13 projects. 14 * Sec. 3. AS 14.11.030(b) is amended to read: 15 (b) Legislative appropriations, including appropriations of interest earned on 16 the fund, shall be deposited in the fund established under this section. [THE 17 UNOBLIGATED AND UNEXPENDED CASH BALANCE OF THE FUND MAY 18 NOT EXCEED $70,000,000.] Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.